Utah statutes.
53-7-225.5.   Inspection and testing of automatic fire sprinkler systems --
Certification required.
(1)  Each person engaged in the inspection and testing of automatic fire
sprinkler systems shall be certified by the state fire marshal.
(2)  The board shall by rule prescribe an application form and standards for
certification qualification and for renewal and revocation.
(3)  Applicants for certification as an automatic fire sprinkler system
inspector and tester shall:
(a)  submit a written application on the form prescribed by the board;
(b)  provide evidence of competency as required by the board; and
(c)  submit the fee established under Subsection (4).
(4)  The board may establish an application fee under Section 63J-1-504.
